Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-628
Laundering of sales forms; penalty.

A person other than a sales form processor commits the offense of laundering of sales forms if such person presents for payment to any sales form processor a sales form which was not originated as a result of a sales transaction between such person and the account holder named on such sales form.

Any person committing the offense of laundering of sales forms shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 12.